Utah statutes.
58-60-103.   Licensure required.
(1)  An individual shall be licensed under this chapter; Chapter 67, Utah
Medical Practice Act, or Chapter 68, Utah Osteopathic Medical Practice Act;
Chapter 31b, Nurse Practice Act; Chapter 61, Psychologist Licensing Act; or
exempted from licensure under this chapter in order to:
(a)  engage in or represent he will engage in the practice of mental health
therapy, clinical social work, certified social work, marriage and family
therapy, or professional counseling; or
(b)  practice as or represent himself as a mental health therapist, clinical
social worker, certified social worker, marriage and family therapist,
professional counselor, psychiatrist, psychologist, or registered psychiatric
mental health nurse specialist.
(2)  An individual shall be licensed under this chapter or exempted from
licensure under this chapter in order to:
(a)  engage in or represent that he is engaged in practice as a social service
worker; or
(b)  represent himself as or use the title of social service worker.
(3)  An individual shall be licensed under this chapter or exempted from
licensure under this chapter in order to:
(a)  engage in or represent that he is engaged in practice as a licensed
substance abuse counselor; or
(b)  represent himself as or use the title of licensed substance abuse
counselor.
(4)  Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection 58-1-307(1)(c), an
individual shall be certified under this chapter, or otherwise exempted from
licensure under this chapter in order to engage in an internship or residency
program of supervised clinical training necessary to meet the requirements for
licensure as:
(a)  a marriage and family therapist under Part 3; or
(b)  a professional counselor under Part 4.
